Washington statutes.
RCW 3.72.020

Youth court agreement.

(1) A youth court agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile accused of a traffic infraction, transit infraction, or civil infraction and a court whereby the juvenile agrees to fulfill certain conditions imposed by a youth court in lieu of a determination that the infraction occurred. Such agreements may be entered into only after the law enforcement authority has determined that probable cause exists to believe that a traffic infraction, transit infraction, or civil infraction has been committed and that the juvenile committed it. A youth court agreement shall be reduced to writing and signed by the court and the youth accepting the terms of the agreement. Such agreements shall be entered into as expeditiously as possible.

(2) Conditions imposed on a juvenile by a youth court shall be limited to one or more of the following:

(a) Community service not to exceed one hundred fifty hours, not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile is attending school;

(b) Attendance at defensive driving school or driver improvement education classes or, in the discretion of the court, a like means of fulfilling this condition. The state shall not be liable for costs resulting from the youth court or the conditions imposed upon the juvenile by the youth court;

(c) A monetary penalty, not to exceed one hundred dollars. All monetary penalties assessed and collected under this section shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as costs, fines, forfeitures, and penalties are assessed and collected under RCW 2.68.040, * 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 35.20.220, and 46.63.110(7), regardless of the juvenile's successful or unsuccessful completion of the youth court agreement;

(d) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school, or work, and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical areas;

(e) Participating in law-related education classes;

(f) Providing periodic reports to the youth court or the court;

(g) Participating in mentoring programs;

(h) Serving as a participant in future youth court proceedings;

(i) Writing apology letters; or

(j) Writing essays.

(3) Youth courts may require that the youth pay any costs associated with conditions imposed upon the youth by the youth court.

(a) A youth court disposition shall be completed within one hundred eighty days from the date of referral.

(b) The court, as specified in RCW 3.72.010, shall monitor the successful or unsuccessful completion of the disposition.

(4) A youth court agreement may extend beyond the eighteenth birthday of the youth.

(5) Any juvenile who is, or may be, referred to a youth court shall be afforded due process in all contacts with the youth court regardless of whether the juvenile is accepted by the youth court or whether the youth court program is successfully completed. Such due process shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A written agreement shall be executed stating all conditions in clearly understandable language and the action that will be taken by the court upon successful or unsuccessful completion of the agreement;

(b) Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only grounds for termination.

(6) The youth court shall, subject to available funds, be responsible for providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters to effectively communicate during youth court hearings or negotiations.

(7) The court shall be responsible for advising a juvenile of his or her rights as provided in this chapter.

(8) When a juvenile enters into a youth court agreement, the court may receive only the following information for dispositional purposes:

(a) The fact that a traffic infraction, transit infraction, or civil infraction was alleged to have been committed;

(b) The fact that a youth court agreement was entered into;

(c) The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;

(d) Whether the juvenile performed his or her obligations under such agreement; and

(e) The facts of the alleged infraction.

(9) A court may refuse to enter into a youth court agreement with a juvenile. When a court refuses to enter a youth court agreement with a juvenile, it shall set the matter for hearing in accordance with all applicable court rules and statutory provisions governing the hearing and disposition of traffic infractions, transit infractions, and civil infractions.

(10) If a monetary penalty required by a youth court agreement cannot reasonably be paid due to a lack of financial resources of the youth, the court may convert any or all of the monetary penalty into community service. The modification of the youth court agreement shall be in writing and signed by the juvenile and the court. The number of hours of community service in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

[ 2020 c 191 s 3; 2017 c 9 s 3; 2002 c 237 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 3.46.120 was repealed by 2008 c 227 s 12, effective July 1, 2008.